West Virginia, session 2026, HB5674.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 6. CRIMES AGAINST THE PEACE. §61-6-21. Prohibiting violations of an individual’s civil rights; penalties; when evidence not admissible; sentencing alternatives; "Angel’s Law". (a) All persons within the boundaries of the State of West Virginia have the right to be free from any violence, or intimidation by threat of violence, committed against their persons or property because of their race, color, religion, ancestry, national origin, political affiliation, or sex, disability, gender identity, or sexual orientation.(b) If any person does by force or threat of force, willfully injure, intimidate or interfere with, or attempt to injure, intimidate or interfere with, or oppress or threaten any other person in the free exercise or enjoyment of any right or privilege secured to him or her by the Constitution or laws of the State of West Virginia or by the Constitution or laws of the United States, because of such other person's and the other person was intentionally selected due to their actual or perceived race, color, religion, ancestry, national origin, political affiliation, or sex, disability, gender identity, or sexual orientation, he or she shall be is guilty of a felony and, upon conviction, shall be fined not more than $5,000 or imprisoned in a state correctional facility not more than 10 years, or both fined and imprisoned: Provided, That an adjudication under subsection (h) of this section is an appropriate alternative sentencing.(c) If any person conspires with another person or persons to, by force or threat of force,  willfully injure, oppress, threaten, or intimidate or interfere with any citizen because of such intentionally selected due to that other person’s race, color, religion, ancestry, national origin, political affiliation, or sex, disability, gender identity, or sexual orientation in the free exercise or enjoyment of any right or privilege secured to him or her by the Constitution or laws of the State of West Virginia or by the Constitution or laws of the United States, and in willful furtherance thereof to assemble with one or more persons for the purpose of teaching any technique or means capable of causing property damage, bodily injury or death when such person or persons intend to employ such techniques or means to violate this section, each such person shall be is guilty of a felony, and, upon conviction, shall be fined not more than $5,000 or imprisoned in a state correctional facility not more than 10 years, or both fined and imprisoned: Provided, That an adjudication under subsection (h) of this section is an appropriate alternative sentencing.(d) The fact that a person committed a felony or misdemeanor, or attempted to commit a felony, because of the and intentionally selected the victim due to victim’s actual or perceived race, color, religion, ancestry, national origin, political affiliation, or sex, gender identity, or sexual orientation shall be considered a circumstance in aggravation of any crime in imposing sentence.(e) Nothing contained in this section makes unlawful the teaching of any technique in self-defense.(f) Nothing in this section shall be construed so as to make it unlawful nor to prohibit nor, in any manner, to impede or to interfere with any person in conducting labor union or labor union organizing activities.(g) In any prosecution under this section, evidence of constitutionally protected speech or associations is not admissible in the prosecution of the charge, unless the speech or associations are: (1) Specifically related to the crime charged; and (2) Probative of intent to target a specific victim or to commit a specific crime, as defined in subsections (a), (b), (c), and (d) of this section.(h) A person convicted under this section shall be considered for deferred adjudication under §61-11-22a of this code, and alternative sentencing including, but not limited to, community corrections programming under §62-11C-1 et seq. of this code.(i) The judge or magistrate shall determine if alternative sentencing is appropriate by considering the following factors:(1) Whether appropriate community corrections programs exist in the county or municipality with jurisdiction; and(2) Whether a community corrections program provides an opportunity for the harm to be remediated, or for the victim or convicted to be reintegrated into the community. (j) The amendments to this section shall be known as "Angel’s Law".